Washington statutes.
RCW 13.50.270

Destruction of records.

(1)(a) Subject to RCW 13.50.050(13), all records maintained by any court or law enforcement agency, including the juvenile court, local law enforcement, the Washington state patrol, and the prosecutor's office, shall be automatically destroyed within ninety days of becoming eligible for destruction. Juvenile records are eligible for destruction when:

(i) The person who is the subject of the information or complaint is at least eighteen years of age;

(ii) The records in question consist of successfully completed diversion agreements and counsel and release agreements, or both, which were completed on or after June 7, 2018; and

(iii) There is no restitution owing in the case.

(b) Notwithstanding this subsection (1), records of successfully completed diversion agreements and counsel and release agreements remain subject to destruction under the terms set forth in subsections (2) through (4) of this section, as well as sealing under RCW 13.50.260.

(c) No less than quarterly, the administrative office of the courts shall provide a report to the juvenile courts of those individuals whose records may be eligible for destruction. The juvenile court shall verify eligibility and notify the Washington state patrol and the appropriate local law enforcement agency and prosecutor's office of the records to be destroyed. The requirement to destroy records under this subsection is not dependent on a court hearing or the issuance of a court order to destroy records.

(d) The state and local governments and their officers and employees are not liable for civil damages for the failure to destroy records pursuant to this section.

(2) All records maintained by any court or law enforcement agency, including the juvenile court, local law enforcement, the Washington state patrol, and the prosecutor's office, shall be automatically destroyed within thirty days of being notified by the governor's office that the subject of those records received a full and unconditional pardon by the governor.

(3)(a) A person may request that the court order the records in his or her case destroyed as follows:

(i) A person eighteen years of age or older whose criminal history consists entirely of one diversion agreement or counsel and release entered prior to June 12, 2008. The request shall be granted if the court finds that two years have elapsed since completion of the agreement or counsel and release.

(ii) A person twenty-three years of age or older whose criminal history consists of only referrals for diversion. The request shall be granted if the court finds that all diversion agreements have been successfully completed and no proceeding is pending against the person seeking the conviction of a criminal offense.

(b) If the court grants the motion to destroy records made pursuant to this subsection, it shall, subject to RCW 13.50.050(13), order the official juvenile court record, the social file, and any other records named in the order to be destroyed.

(c) The person making the motion pursuant to this subsection must give reasonable notice of the motion to the prosecuting attorney and to any agency whose records are sought to be destroyed.

(4) Any juvenile justice or care agency may, subject to the limitations in RCW 13.50.050(13) and this section, develop procedures for the routine destruction of records relating to juvenile offenses and diversions.

(a) Records may be routinely destroyed only when the person the subject of the information or complaint has attained twenty-three years of age or older or pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

(b) The court may not routinely destroy the official juvenile court record or recordings or transcripts of any proceedings.

[ 2018 c 82 s 5; 2014 c 175 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2014 c 175: See note following RCW 13.50.010.